Ohio, session 136, SB41.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5.57 of the Revised Code be 3
enacted to read as follows: 4
Sec. 5.57. (A) The twenty-second day of January is 5
designated as the "Day of Tears," to observe the anniversary of 6
the erroneous ruling by the supreme court of the United States 7
on January 22, 1973, that abortion was a right secured by the 8
Constitution of the United States. The "Day of Tears" is 9
designated to remember and mourn the innocent, unborn children 10
who have lost their lives due to abortion. 11
(B) Residents of this state are encouraged to lower their 12
flags to half-staff on the "Day of Tears." 13